Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3,156
Additional fees.

In
addition to the registration fees for motor vehicles and trailers, the county
treasurer or his or her agent shall collect:

(1) Two dollars for
each certificate issued and shall remit two
dollars of each additional fee collected to the State Treasurer
for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund;

(2) Fifty cents for each certificate issued and shall remit the fee
to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Emergency Medical System
Operations Fund; and

(3) One dollar and fifty cents for each certificate issued and shall
remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Recreation Road
Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 156;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 83;

Laws 2013, LB207, § 3.